Utah statutes.
63C-8-106.   Rural residency training program.

(1)  For purposes of this section:

(a)  "Physician" means:

(i)  a person licensed to practice medicine under Title 58, Chapter 67, Utah Medical Practice Act or Title 58, Chapter 68, Utah Osteopathic Medical Practice Act; and

(ii)  a person licensed to practice dentistry under Title 58, Chapter 69, Dentist and Dental Hygienist Practice Act.

(b)  "Rural residency training program" means an accredited clinical training program as defined in Section 63C-8-101 which places a physician into a rural county for a part or all of the physician's clinical training.

(2) (a)  Subject to appropriations from the Legislature, the council shall establish a pilot program to place physicians into rural residency training programs.

(b)  The pilot program shall begin July 1, 2005 and sunset July 1, 2015, in accordance with Section 63I-1-263.

(3) (a)  The council shall report to the Legislature's Health and Human Services Interim Committee concerning the implementation of the pilot program and the success of the program in increasing the retention or recruitment of physicians in rural counties in the state.

(b)  The report required by this Subsection (3) shall be made by November 30 of each year.

